src/fst/orthography/inituppercase.regex
a (->) A, b (->) B, c (->) C, č (->) Č, d (->) D, e (->) E, f (->) F, g (->) G,
h (->) H, i (->) I, j (->) J, k (->) K, l (->) L, m (->) M, n (->) N, o (->) O,
p (->) P, q (->) Q, r (->) R, s (->) S, š (->) Š, t (->) T, u (->) U, ü (->) Ü,
v (->) V, w (->) W, x (->) X, y (->) Y, z (->) Z, ž (->) Ž, ä (->) Ä, ö (->) Ö || .#. _ ;
